Massachusetts, session 194th, H2370.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12N of Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1 through 9, the words “no abortion
may be performed except by a physician, and only if in the best medical judgment of the
physician it is: (i) necessary to preserve the life of the patient; (ii) necessary to preserve the
patient's physical or mental health; (iii) warranted because of a lethal fetal anomaly or diagnosis;
or (iv) warranted because of a grave fetal diagnosis that indicates that the fetus is incompatible
with sustained life outside of the uterus without extraordinary medical interventions.” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- an abortion may be performed when based upon
the professional judgment of the physician.
SECTION 2. Section 12N1/2 of said chapter 112, as so appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines1 through 4 the words “(a) Each circumstance
permitting an abortion for a pregnancy that has existed for 24 weeks or more under section 12N
of 2

shall be considered independently by a treating physician and a patient or the patient's health care
proxy.”
SECTION 3. Said section 12N1/2 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 5, the words “a determination by” and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- “the professional judgment of”.
SECTION 4. Said section 12N1/2 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out subsection (b).
SECTION 5. Section 12P of said chapter 112, as so appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby further amended by striking out the second paragraph.
of 2